Illinois, session 104th, SB2292.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Personnel Code is amended by changing 5Section 8b and by adding Section 8b.21 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 415/8b)  (from Ch. 127, par. 63b108b)7    Sec. 8b. Jurisdiction B - Merit and fitness. 8    (a) For positions in the State service subject to the 9jurisdiction of the Department of Central Management Services 10with respect to selection and tenure on the basis of merit and 11fitness, those matters specified in this Section and Sections 128b.1 through 8b.21 8b.17.13    (b) Application, testing and hiring procedures for all 14State employment vacancies for positions not exempt under 15Section 4c shall be reduced to writing and made available to 16the public via the Department's website or equivalent. All 17vacant positions subject to Jurisdiction B shall be posted. 18Vacant positions shall be posted on the Department's website 19in such a way that potential job candidates can easily 20identify and apply for job openings and identify the county in 21which the vacancy is located. Vacant positions shall be 22updated at least weekly.23    (c) If a position experiences a vacancy rate that is   SB2292- 2 -LRB104 10160 BDA 20232 b1greater than or equal to 10%, that position shall be posted 2until the vacancy rate is less than 10%. 3(Source: P.A. 103-108, eff. 6-27-23.) 4    (20 ILCS 415/8b.21 new)5    Sec. 8b.21. Hiring deadlines for applicants.6    (a) Civil service examinations for applicants, including 7assessments under Section 8b.1, if required, shall be 8scheduled and completed within 10 days of the application 9deadline.10    (b) Interviews for applicants shall be scheduled and 11conducted within 20 days of the release of the results of any 12civil service examinations under subsection (a), or, if no 13civil service examinations are required, interviews shall be 14scheduled and conducted within 20 days of the application 15deadline.16    (c) The selection process shall be completed within 10 17days of the completion of the interview process under 18subsection (b).19    (d) The Department is responsible for enforcing the 20deadlines set forth in this Section. Any deviation from the 21established deadlines under this Section must be documented 22and justified by the hiring agency.